Other/Precision Software/Precision Lang Suite/Editor/Extras/Hunspell/Dictionaries/fy.dic
rolje/lQ
fûnen/OB
ferskriklik/SQU
presentearje/r
wrâld/LOQR
psychology/a
skinen/I
freegjen/AOB
kealje/l
slagje/gQ
warje/Br
bewarje/Qr
kleaster/RP
slaan/LAMFCIHJ
katsje/D
skerp/USTZ
skerpe/AF
plantaardich/S
harkje/BAW
sitten/FKACIHB
dieden/N
bou/FLAEHIOU
Hamster/R
baksels/N
romje/FCImQ
ynromje/m
Unwennich/YS
echte/G
sliep/SQTU
sliere/X
rette/BIAQ
dielen/KACIHO
sljocht/ZST
rieden/KAB
jongereingroep/Q
praat/AMHBDLUP
oan/OK
symboalen/J
hannele/OIDNT
hannel/PR
opdoeke/X
rikje/kQ
donder/ER
taaste/BNDAQ
taast/AB
taasten/DA
byldzjen/I
strategy/Qa
synysk/S
willekeurich/GS
roppe/LAFBTQ
roppen/BHLFS
kundigje/IAW
fallende/ACF
oefenje/HW
slaande/FM
wûnestû/I
begjin/AU
pakke/AHICFQ
pakje/k
hoflik/YZ
bereizgje/W
generearje/V
jierdei/R
inoar/AKJOHCFMR
falsk/YSZ
boekingen/J
tein/IF
skilje/lQ
boat/PQ
skreppen/B
bûnzje/LW
ferbûn/YSQZ
minske-ûntearjend/S
teology/a
ûnôfhinklik/YSZT
plakje/Rk
lykje/IQ
blaze/FDHCQ
gelok/G
beliedsmjittige/T
sneupe/LX
tinkber/GZY
leard/MIHBDEAZSQ
learde/AE
lôgje/W
sprekke/HABCTQ
diskusearje/r
sykje/OBHIFMQ
syk/OIBEA
sykjen/BFIHO
snije/OMAQ
bleau/JIU
hâldt/OAFCIHB
hingje/HALFQ
dampe/IX
sterk/JTUZ
smiten/FIHB
mytology/a
tikje/CQk
beheind/GSZQT
klikt/AMS
tankje/BW
glinster/E
pleatst/INS
parochje/R
folje/FCIAQl
ynfolje/lQ
foljen/FA
heakje/CDkRQ
wenje/BQn
bewenje/Qn
socht/AFIHBOUQS
brocht/FLACIHOMJUQS
snoad/SUZ
brekt/CIHDAM
gjalp/HQ
hûd/KQ
hûs/KP
goaid/FCQS
oarspronklik/YZST
geand/MLJDHC
achtet/I
rinnend/MFDHS
kommen/OMJBFLKACHD
skodholje/Ql
wilje/Ll
ferdûbele/Q
levering/JD
stjit/AH
minlik/SZY
noegje/HW
oantrúnd/S
rekkenje/BHKDW
boartlik/STYZ
winje/n
ljochtsjende/K
fang/EAILFSUQ
neitink/QUS
skiedingen/DO
tsjinje/BCInQ
tins/CAR
wachter/R
do/ST
beheard/GQT
jas/JP
wikseljen/LI
hear/IBRSUQ
bidde/AQT
sjoch/KJBHICGU
útsjoch/K
titele/OB
man/KP
spile/MCIHBDJTQ
fierd/FCIHDAMTQS
dien/ONAMKHJIFBDSQ
die/KIHNAFCT
heid/ZQS
bouwe/LICFQ
bouwen/FLIHE
ferdjipje/pQ
rie/KIGB
noaskje/W
bykomstich/YS
twawurdliddich/S
programmearje/V
logyske/G
giet/ONAMCHJIL
farren/IB
trunen/A
wâld/JBQS
yt/RU
baarnt/I
rukt/Q
formele/C
stjitten/IHD
guod/O
kant/OKPSTQ
fier/ACHIDZSUQ
keart/FID
soude/T
lokkich/ES
minst/KQZS
betreklik/SYZ
laden/JDBHFS
gripen/BC
garje/Qr
ling/O
gean/DBFLIJHCKMANOS
slút/DBHCAS
wiuwt/A
helje/FCIHBDJAQl
hellest/ACIH
wizer/AOPRS
wizers/O
skreaune/BOCKLH
brûke/XT
brûk/NEGI
brûkt/IN
brûkten/N
nimt/OAMCJIFBD
keardel/R
slikje/kQ
slikke/BA
flean/ISQU
fleane/DI
leech/GL
sjogge/BJMHCAGT
spuite/BJQ
skjinje/F
flokt/HIS
toane/BIA
skriuwe/AFJBOLCHDKTQ
skriuwen/BHLKCO
stjoert/IHAFBC
winsklik/GZS
flugge/T
piel/ELQS
meager/YSZ
skat/OJ
wurklik/GYS
bylden/KAD
weitsjen/B
fekje/k
gefoel/KZ
tryst/ZS
assimilearje/V
wearzgje/W
dolle/LQT
priizge/A
hipt/NISQ
hipte/NI
tochten/FJMBC
stean/KNODBIGFALS
steane/FKIDOB
gongen/MJBFLACHD
stjoer/GIJB
sûpe/IFTX
fersûpe/X
sûp/EP
gunt/N
wurksum/YS
lomp/Z
witte/DQ
bod/IEA
sette/KJDBHICFMALQ
setten/LKACIHDMJBF
beweech/U
stel/OKHFBD
anderje/W
griemen/I
rêst/EGHBSQ
ride/MHFBT
nim/AMIU
skatting/JCORQ
dreger/SR
kanalisearje/V
ret/ABIU
fers/QPR
himpnettel/R
natuerlik/GSTZ
besletten/Z
gapje/Qp
lûke/AMCHFBDX
oanlûke/XT
legen/EIR
legere/B
binlik/ZY
skot/LJKR
opdroegje/W
droege/HDT
topje/Qp
bittere/I
kear/CILDRSQ
stowe/Q
kamen/HDKA
ark/SQP
gas/U
tike/N
kennen/NBI
frij/GBYSZTQ
bringe/FLACHOMJTQ
al/JEKU
minsk/YQS
trene/QT
ferantwurdlik/GSZY
lein/OAKCHJILFBDSQ
leine/AOBHICF
wierheid/BG
swets/EUQ
dringe/FC
lêzen/DJKLMCHB
lêze/MKHJBT
lês/KU
streakje/W
ûndogensk/ZY
wurdend/S
heel/E
like/ICN
tel/NIP
film/TPSR
ynteressante/G
liede/FCIBDNLTQ
lieders/IC
fin/ZPSQT
regeard/Q
bergje/IFW
haadskiedsrjochter/R
Frij/ZQSY
trêden/H
regearje/V
blikje/CIRk
stopje/IpQ
ferstopje/Qp
falt/AKHJIFBD
slokje/kR
stien/AMFGIBDNKPQS
stie/BFIKMA
sicht/EJHCFMAS
gekje/Bk
grave/OBFQ
ûnfoldien/SZ
skikt/EOBAQ
geskikt/GOSTY
Tirol/T
mien/EQUSZ
gien/ONAMCHJILFBDSQ
rôljen/A
Unôfhinklik/YTSZ
geduldich/G
slomje/mQ
oppompe/X
jaan/AMHJIFBD
fleanende/J
fiskje/FWR
doarp/PQ
foech/C
dreaun/AIHNMJBSQ
bedreaun/QZ
dieling/FCIDRQ
lûd/EJUTQS
lûdst/S
neuke/IX
waaksjende/F
woeksen/HNFB
rin/FLJABDIOU
suggerearje/Wr
komt/AKHJILFBD
Ofwêzich/YS
opleverje/W
levere/DHCAJ
halte/EQ
naam/DBFIJCKAOU
nuttich/GRS
wurde/IE
ris/HUSR
settings/JBHLD
stappe/JDHCLFQ
parte/LIFQ
tarre/IFQ
nomd/AFB
sfearympresje/R
aktualisearje/V
Folje/l
Helje/l
waadrinne/QT
drukke/CHOTQ
degelik/SY
't/KLFCJ
hast/QS
trof/A
op/K
seach/AMFCHBKSU
seagje/W
seage/D
e-mail/PQSR
driuwe/BLIJ
sweverich/S
fernimstich/GSY
fertelden/M
fallen/FKACIHDEJB
hege/FIT
aardige/GT
rinne/AMFIHBDJNLTQ
rinner/JHKR
argumintearje/V
âld/JZYQTUSR
begryp/GNU
laach/OFP
stutsen/BCHDAFJ
stuts/JHF
meitsjen/FIHAD
Ofskilderje/Q
benearje/Wr
slach/NDBHICFMALU
Utdrukking/QR
persoanlik/GYTSR
tal/AEQ
hjirnei/U
spraak/KACHD
stellingen/BCK
fong/FIQ
dangelje/LW
dangeljen/L
gysten/SZY
aardzje/I
tekenje/FOHW
yntern/SQ
oertsjûgje/W
skaaiende/AH
feint/PQ
tiid/BJCKR
teart/HB
wenning/BQR
skimerlampe/Q
sparje/BrQ
besparje/Qr
bedimme/G
moedich/CJN
beselskipje/p
Untwerp/SQT
bykomt/K
skeppend/F
snien/DHAS
ûnberoaid/SZ
tûk/YSQTPUZ
mêde/D
goed/KQZSR
hantsje/LR
rekking/A
bemachtigje/W
konservearje/V
foarpoat/QP
islamitysk/S
stoarje/HQRr
mûn/SQT
swijt/I
stjoerder/BACR
reedride/QT
elkoar/MOHCAKR
springe/CFQ
poepe/X
Ofhinklik/YZSQ
bekje/k
spesifisearje/V
stekje/k
stekken/DAJ
krûd/GQS
iepenbierje/Wr
sûn/SQZ
leafde/KR
morfology/a
wiis/OIBYU
krûpe/AXT
keard/FCIHBLSQ
kearden/BL
bist/SQ
útskuord/O
observearje/V
fertsjinwurdiger/R
slûpe/BX
stoffich/S
sichtbere/G
sjong/BSQTU
Utstap/P
healwiis/EY
pakesizzer/JR
stoarn/IHDB
appellearje/V
hoask/SZ
hoede/BKTQ
alderheislik/U
groeie/HCQ
kaai/QP
klaaid/BAIHSQ
skraste/M
Utdruklik/S
realistysk/GST
foarmje/IW
foarme/NIL
histoarysk/KSQ
jefte/AJHFMQ
puber/R
rok/SP
ûnstjerlik/SY
hokje/Rk
sêft/GTSZ
sjen/AKCHJLFBD
kaft/LQ
skyn/K
werpe/OQ
praktysk/TS
sit/BRTU
skruten/TZS
oerkommeling/QR
respektearje/V
lieken/B
melden/AI
litten/JFCIH
wichtich/ERSU
ketterij/QS
tyspelje/W
trape/BIMQ
gebrûklik/GS
polderjen/C
hegepryster/R
pedagogy/a
slute/DBHCAQ
wurge/T
bywenje/n
badinearje/V
fonology/a
presidint/Q
stom/Y
rûn/IDMHBNAJLFUQPS
fertokje/k
hâlde/OJKAFCIHBDTQ
hâlden/OJBFACIH
wurpen/OF
skotten/L
herhelje/lQ
tillefoan/PR
remje/D
lekje/kQ
bushalte/QR
trou/GIB
kibje/b
seam/SQ
sâlt/S
obstrewearje/V
loft/QTR
etymology/Qa
keaper/CR
lear/IQUSR
rjochte/CAFGBO
klikje/kR
klikke/AM
neaken/YTZS
Libje/b
fjochten/E
fertsjinwurdiging/O
ekswethâlder/R
ferlangje/W
langsten/I
streep/P
blinke/X
makje/k
makket/MAIH
makkers/F
magy/a
rûke/X
stamje/DmQ
fleurich/SY
toanielspile/T
lêsboeken/K
ynvestearje/V
geology/a
kloai/S
stipepunt/Q
eamele/L
fuotbalje/Ql
lilk/TUYSZ
minderweardichheidsgefoel/Z
fanfare/R
sympatike/GT
frege/AODBQ
fregen/O
definearje/r
formulearje/V
finger/PR
opmerke/XT
foldwaande/G
dôvje/IW
argeology/a
sûge/HT
sillich/GYS
ûntlokje/k
handich/DYUS
narje/Qr
stimt/J
krinke/X
elegy/Qa
útjouwerij/Q
feministe/QR
loek/FQU
eare/IX
logje/g
logge/T
sitearje/V
prebearje/r
lokje/k
stipje/p
skuorre/DHIQ
ferstân/NG
dope/LQ
werhelje/lQ
set/KIDMHBNAJLFCPUR
misje/s
Soan/P
kroan/E
fuorje/rQ
libje/MFCHBJQb
biology/a
preludearje/r
heal/S
klopje/ApQ
technology/a
woegen/D
dûke/OCFTX
opdûke/X
wurkje/MBCIHRW
register/R
stiicht/J
kommunikaasje/N
funksjonele/T
ikje/k
terminology/aQ
degradearje/V
knikje/k
molk/QS
sosjology/a
nostalgy/a
neistribje/bQ
genealogy/a
skrilje/l
tagonklike/G
redigearje/V
strûpen/O
adviseur/R
trekken/B
taalgeografysk/S
sprong/KJPQ
sprongen/JL
ûnnoazel/SRYZ
hearskje/JBW
ynstallearje/V
lokaal/P
boaden/E
batsk/ZYS
polemisearje/V
sneden/M
knoop/U
taalkoade/R
pier/Q
drokker/S
ferkrêfte/T
raak/L
trilje/lQ
bakje/kR
bedarje/rQ
hiërargy/a
jûchhei/ES
ideology/aQ
filosofearje/V
muoi/BP
skimerich/S
ider/BR
reparearje/V
klom/B
telle/BIFMT
betelje/lQ
belje/FlQ
flamje/m
taalsosjology/a
Wierum/T
sakke/DBHCMQ
sakje/DkQ
sakket/D
taferiel/Q
popje/p
radikalisearje/V
glûpe/X
pasje/As
oanpasje/s
stribje/BbQ
bestribje/bQ
lisplakken/A
tapasje/s
stekkende/JAH
flekje/kR
romanskriuwer/R
rilje/l
ûnferjitlik/S
damje/mQ
feroarje/W
das/P
húsmanje/n
Ropje/p
streket/O
folksdûnser/R
bonke/X
absolút/Y
akkelei/Q
sjike/T
duorje/rQ
bok/RU
